Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1806
Sellers; duties.

Any person selling or offering for sale to consumers any American Indian arts and crafts shall make inquiry of manufacturers and producers of such arts and crafts concerning the methods and materials used in the manufacture and production of such arts and crafts for the purpose of determining whether such arts and crafts are authentic or imitation.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 6.